Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.11, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. General prohibitions. This subdivision lists general prohibitions against discrimination on the basis of disability. For purposes of this subdivision, "individual" or "class of individuals" refers to the clients or customers of the covered public accommodation that enter into the contractual, licensing, or other arrangement. (1) It is discriminatory to: (i) subject an individual or class of individuals on the basis of a disability of that individual or class, directly or through contractual, licensing, or other arrangements, to a denial of the opportunity of the individual or class to participate in or benefit from the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations of an entity; (ii) afford an individual or class of individuals on the basis of the disability of that individual or class, directly or through contractual, licensing, or other arrangements, with the opportunity to participate in or benefit from the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations that are not equal to those afforded to other individuals; (iii) provide an individual or class of individuals, on the basis of a disability of that individual or class, directly or through contractual, licensing, or other arrangements, with goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations that are different or separate from those provided to other individuals, unless the action is necessary to provide the individual or class of individuals with goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations, or other opportunities that are as effective as those provided to others; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (iv) not provide a deaf or hard-of-hearing individual or class of deaf or hard-of-hearing individuals with closed-captioned television when television services are provided to other individualsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (v) not provide an individual or class of individuals, on the basis of a mobility disability of that individual or class, accessible medical equipment necessary to provide the individual or class of individuals with full access to health care services and facilities equal to that of an individual or class of individuals without a mobility disability. Accessible medical equipment includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (A) accessible, adjustable height examination tables and chairs; new text end new text begin (B) manual transfer items, such as a transfer board and strap; new text end new text begin (C) portable floor lifts; and new text end new text begin (D) overhead track lifts. new text end (2) Goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, and accommodations must be afforded to an individual with a disability in the most integrated setting appropriate to the needs of the individual. (3) Notwithstanding the existence of separate or different programs or activities provided in accordance with sections 363A.08 to 363A.19, and 363A.28, subdivision 10, the individual with a disability may not be denied the opportunity to participate in the programs or activities that are not separate or different. (4) An individual or entity may not, directly or through contractual or other arrangements, use standards or criteria and methods of administration: (i) that have the effect of discriminating on the basis of disability; or (ii) that perpetuate the discrimination of others who are subject to common administrative control. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.11, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Specific prohibitions. This subdivision lists specific prohibitions against discrimination on the basis of disability. For purposes of this subdivision, discrimination includes: (1) the imposition or application of eligibility criteria that screen out or tend to screen out an individual with a disability or any class of individuals with disabilities from fully and equally enjoying any goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations, unless the criteria can be shown to be necessary for the provision of the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations; (2) failure to make reasonable modifications in policies, practices, or procedures when the modifications are necessary to afford the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations to individuals with disabilities, unless the entity can demonstrate that making the modifications would fundamentally alter the nature of the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations; (3) failure to take all necessary steps to ensure that no individual with a disability is excluded, denied services, segregated, or otherwise treated differently than other individuals because of the absence of auxiliary aids and services, unless the entity can demonstrate that taking the steps would fundamentally alter the nature of the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations being offered and would result in an undue burden; (4) failure to remove architectural barriers, and communication barriers that are structural in nature, in existing facilities, and transportation barriers in existing vehicles used by an establishment for transporting individuals, not including barriers that can only be removed through the retrofitting of vehicles by the installation of hydraulic or other lifts, if the removal is readily achievable; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (5) if an entity can demonstrate that the removal of a barrier under clause (4) is not readily achievable or cannot be considered a reasonable accommodation, a failure to make the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations available through alternative means if the means are readily achievabledeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (6) failure to provide an individual with a mobility disability receiving health care services at any clinical setting that moves patients, as defined in section 182.6552, with accessible medical equipment, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) accessible, adjustable height examination tables and chairs; new text end new text begin (ii) manual transfer items, such as a transfer board and strap; new text end new text begin (iii) portable floor lifts; and new text end new text begin (iv) overhead track lifts. new text end